Florida, session 2026, HB389.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 386.202, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
386.202 Legislative intent.—The purpose of this part is to
protect people from the health hazards of secondhand tobacco and
marijuana smoke and vapor and to implement the Florida health
initiative in s. 20, Art. X of the State Constitution. It is the
intent of the Legislature to not inhibit, or otherwise obstruct,
medical or scientific research, or smoking or vaping cessation
programs approved by the Department of Health.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb389-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 389 2026
Section 2. Present subsections (9) through (17) of section
386.203, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (10)
through (18), respectively, a new subsection (9) is added to
that section, and present subsections (11) and (13) of that
section are amended, to read:
386.203 Definitions.—As used in this part:
(9) "Public place" means a place to which the public has
access, including, but not limited to, streets; sidewalks;
highways; public parks; public beaches; and the common areas,
both inside and outside, of schools, hospitals, government
buildings, apartment buildings, office buildings, lodging
establishments, restaurants, transportation facilities, and
retail shops.
(12)(11) "Smoking" means inhaling, exhaling, burning,
carrying, or possessing any lighted tobacco or marijuana
product, including cigarettes, cigars, pipe tobacco, and any
other lighted tobacco or marijuana product.
(14)(13) "Vape" or "vaping" means to inhale or exhale
vapor produced by a vapor-generating electronic device or to
possess a vapor-generating electronic device while that device
is actively employing an electronic, a chemical, or a mechanical
means designed to produce vapor or aerosol from a nicotine or
marijuana product or any other substance. The term does not
include the mere possession of a vapor-generating electronic
device.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb389-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 389 2026
Section 3. Section 386.204, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
386.204 Prohibition.—A person may not smoke or vape in an
enclosed indoor workplace or a public place, except as otherwise
provided in s. 386.2045. This prohibition does not apply to the
smoking of unfiltered cigars.
Section 4. Subsection (6) is added to section 386.205,
Florida Statutes, to read:
386.205 Customs smoking rooms.—A customs smoking room may
be designated by the person in charge of an airport in-transit
lounge under the authority and control of the Bureau of Customs
and Border Protection of the United States Department of
Homeland Security. A customs smoking room may be designated only
in an airport in-transit lounge under the authority and control
of the Bureau of Customs and Border Protection of the United
States Department of Homeland Security. A customs smoking room
may not be designated in an elevator, restroom, or any common
area as defined by s. 386.203. Each customs smoking room must
conform to the following requirements:
(6) Smoking or vaping of marijuana products is prohibited
in the room at any time.
Section 5. Paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of section
561.695, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
561.695 Stand-alone bar enforcement; qualification;
penalties.—
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb389-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 389 2026
(5) After the initial designation, to continue to qualify
as a stand-alone bar, the licensee must provide to the division
annually, on or before the licensee's annual renewal date, an
affidavit that certifies, with respect to the preceding 12-month
period, the following:
(a) No more than 10 percent of the gross revenue of the
business is from the sale of food consumed on the licensed
premises as specified defined in s. 386.203(13) s. 386.203(12).

The division shall establish by rule the format of the affidavit
required by this subsection. A licensed vendor shall not
knowingly make a false statement on the affidavit required by
this subsection. In addition to the penalties provided in
subsection (7), a licensed vendor who knowingly makes a false
statement on the affidavit required by this subsection may be
subject to suspension or revocation of the vendor's alcoholic
beverage license under s. 561.29.
Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb389-00